Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 11.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-111
Operating agreement; effect on limited
liability company and persons becoming members; preformation agreement.

(ULLCA 111) (a) A limited
liability company is bound by and may enforce the operating agreement, whether
or not the company has itself manifested assent to the operating agreement.

(b) A person that becomes
a member of a limited liability company is deemed to assent to the operating
agreement.

(c)
Two or more persons intending to become the initial members of a limited liability
company may make an agreement providing that upon the formation of the company
the agreement will become the operating agreement. One person intending to
become the initial member of a limited liability company may assent to terms
providing that upon the formation of the company the terms will become the
operating agreement.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 11.